Hawaii statutes.
NONTAXABLE
PROPERTY; ASSESSMENT

§246-21 Nontaxable property. For
purposes of accountability, the director of taxation shall assess at the
nominal sum of $7 each parcel of real property in each district which is
completely exempt from taxation. [L 1932 2d, c 40, pt of §26; RL 1935, pt of
§1935; RL 1945, pt of §5146; RL 1955, §128-10; am L Sp 1957, c 1, §14(e); am L
1963, c 142, §4; am L 1967, c 37, §1; HRS §246-21; am L 1973, c 113, §3; am L
1974, c 132, §1]

Case Notes

Cited: 35 H. 515,
536; 41 H. 141.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next